North Dakota, session 69, HB1448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 54 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
Definitions.
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Chief information officer" means the chief information officer of the information technology
department.
2. "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the department of commerce.
3. "Committee" means the advanced technology review committee.
4. "Department" means the department of commerce.
5. "Vice chancellor for information technology" means the chief information officer and vice
chancellor for information technology of the North Dakota university system.
Advanced technology review committee - Membership - Meetings.
1. The advanced technology review committee consists of:
a. The chief information officer or a designee within the information technology department;
b. The vice chancellor for information technology or a designee within the North Dakota
university system;
c. One individual from the private sector with significant information and advanced
technology knowledge, appointed by the governor;
d. One individual from the private sector with significant information and advanced
technology knowledge, appointed by the majority leader of the house of representatives;
e. One individual from the private sector with significant information and advanced
technology knowledge, appointed by the majority leader of the senate; and
f. The commissioner, or a designee within the department of commerce, who shall serve as
a nonvoting member of the committee and provide recommendations to the committee
regarding grant awards.
2. By July first of each odd - numbered year, the chief information officer and vice chancellor for
information technology shall compile a list of individuals with significant private sector
information and advanced technology knowledge working within the state to be forwarded to
the governor and the majority leaders of the house of representatives and senate. The

H. B. NO. 1448 - PAGE 2
governor and the majority leaders of the house of representatives and senate must consider
the listed individuals for committee membership appointments.
3. The chief information officer, vice chancellor for information technology, and commissioner are
permanent members of the committee. The term of office of the members of the committee
appointed from the private sector is four years except the initial term of office of the individual
appointed by the majority leader of the senate is three years and the initial term of office of the
individual appointed by the governor is two years. Each term of office commences on August
first. Members serve at the pleasure of the appointing entity and may be reappointed for
additional terms. By August first of each year, the chairman of the legislative management
shall select one of the appointed members to serve as the chairman of the committee. The
chairman of the committee shall select a vice chair. If a committee member ceases to qualify
as a member of the appointing entity, that individual's membership on the committee ceases
immediately and the appointing entity shall appoint a new member to the committee for the
remainder of the term.
4. A committee member representing the private sector is entitled to receive compensation in an
amount not exceeding one hundred thirty - five dollars per day and travel and expense
reimbursement as provided by law for state officers for attending meetings of the committee,
to be paid by the department within the limits of legislative appropriations.
5. The committee shall meet as necessary at the call of the committee chairman to review and
approve grant applications from entrepreneurs, startup companies, and small businesses that
are in the initial phases of advanced technology product research, development, and
innovation and are unable to access financial resources for prototype product development.
Advanced technology grant program - Eligibility - Use of funds.
1. The department shall administer the advanced technology grant program to provide grants for
activities identified in this chapter. The department shall provide administrative support for the
program, including the drafting of application forms, receiving applications, reviewing
applications for completeness and compliance with committee policy, and forwarding complete
applications to the committee in accordance with the guidelines established by the committee.
2. The committee shall establish guidelines for entities to qualify for an advanced technology
grant under this section. Program guidelines relating to ownership of intellectual property,
inventions, and discoveries must address activities and issues unique to technologies,
patents, and companies created as a result of an advanced technology grant.
3. In determining whether to approve an application for grant funding, the committee shall
consider the extent to which the applicant's proposal will support early stage research and
development of advance technologies, promote economic development, and advance the
workforce in the state. The committee shall give priority to applications promoting the
advancement of artificial intelligence, machine learning, quantum computing, and similar
research and development and product innovation proposals. The committee shall consider
and process applications in a timely manner to allow applicants an opportunity to leverage
other funds.
4. Grant recipients shall use funding awarded under this section to enhance advance technology
product research, development, and innovation, and to the extent possible, leverage state,
federal, and private sources of funding. An entity receiving a grant under this section may not
use the funds for capital or building investments or other activities not identified in this chapter.
The funds may not be used for administrative costs or to supplant funding for regular
operations of the entity. If an entity awarded a grant no longer conducts its activities in the
state, the entity must repay the awarded grant funding to the department.

H. B. NO. 1448 - PAGE 3
Advanced technology grant fund.
The advanced technology grant fund is a special fund in the state treasury administered by the
department. Moneys in the fund must be used for providing grants and for the payment of committee
and department administrative expenses incurred related to the requirements of this chapter, subject to
legislative appropriations. Interest earned on moneys in the fund must be credited to the fund.
Advanced technology grant program - Postaward monitoring.
Upon completion of work performed from funding provided by an advanced technology grant, the
department shall conduct an independent review of the results. Evaluation criteria may include how the
work performed has:
1. Contributed to development of an advanced technology product or process and enhanced the
ability of a company to make investments in the state, or otherwise enticed a company to
invest in or move to the state;
2. Promoted economic development of the public or private sectors in the state;
3. Led to a patent or research that is commercially viable; or
4. Positively affected workforce in the state.

H. B. NO. 1448 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1448.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State